North Carolina, session 2025, HB658.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 6 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 90-118.5A. Telemedicine practice.
(a) A licensed optometrist may perform the practice of optometry, as defined by this
Article, to treat patients located in this State through the method of telemedicine, as long as the
licensed optometrist has a valid and active license in this State. The licensed optometrist shall
not be required to be located physically in this State or to have a license in the other state in which
the licensed optometrist is located physically while providing care to a patient in this State.
(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the jurisdiction of the Board to
pursue violations of this Article against any licensed optometrist that uses telemedicine to
practice optometry under this section. Further, the use of telemedicine does not alter the scope of
the practice of optometry, and the licensed optometrist is subject to all laws and Board rules while
treating patients in other states."
SECTION 2. The North Carolina Board of Examiners in Optometry shall adopt rules
to implement the provisions of this act, including rules on the licensee-patient relationship,
examination, evaluation, and diagnosis of a patient, patient record keeping, prescribing,
telemedicine standard of care, and display of licensure and credentials, to the extent that these
rules are not contrary to G.S. 90-118.5A, as enacted by Section 1 of this act, and in alignment
with the Board's Telemedicine Position Statement.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
*H658-v-1*